Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-235
Animals and fowl; running at large; regulation.

A city of the first class may regulate or prohibit the running at large of cattle, hogs, horses, mules, sheep, goats, dogs and other animals, chickens, ducks, geese and other fowls, and cause such as may be running at large to be impounded and sold to discharge the costs and penalties provided for the violation of such prohibitions, and the fees and expenses of impounding and keeping the same, and of such sale.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XLI, p. 257;

Laws 1907, c. 13, § 1, p. 111;

R.S.1913, § 4851;

C.S.1922, § 4019;

C.S.1929, § 16-236;

R.S.1943, § 16-235.